Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:(1) The prosecuting attorney may file a special allegation of attempting to conceal identity in every felony criminal case, when sufficient admissible evidence exists, to show that the defendant:(a) Committed the offense, in whole or in part, on the premises of a postsecondary institution; and(b) Wore a mask, hood, or other article of clothing or device that covered, hid, or concealed any portion of the defendant's face, with the intent to prevent identification during the commission of the offense or in immediate flight therefrom.(2) In a criminal case in which there has been a special allegation, the state shall prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the accused committed the offense under the circumstances described in subsection (1) of this section. The court shall make a finding of fact of whether or not the circumstances described in subsection (1) of this section occurred, or if a jury trial is had, the jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty, also find a special verdict as to whether or not the circumstances described in subsection (1) of this section occurred.(3) For the purposes of this section, "postsecondary institution" means any public or private institution of higher education, public or private vocational school, degree-granting institution as defined in RCW 28B.85.010, or school as defined in RCW 18.16.020, located in the state.Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.533 and 2024 c 301 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by ((seventy-five))75 percent.(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least ((twenty))20 years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ((ten))10 years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection (4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c); or(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun or bump-fire stock, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun or bump-fire stock in a felony;(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least ((twenty))20 years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ((ten))10 years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c); or(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun or bump-fire stock, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun or bump-fire stock in a felony;(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility, and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section:(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) or (b) or 69.50.410;(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2) (c), (d), or (e);(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.4013.For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part of that facility or county jail.(6) An additional ((twenty-four))24 months shall be added to the standard sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter 69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or 9.94A.827. All enhancements under this subsection shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter.(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all impaired driving enhancements under this subsection are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other impaired driving enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter.An offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c).(8)(a) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed on or after July 1, 2006, if the offense was committed with sexual motivation, as that term is defined in RCW 9.94A.030. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the sexual motivation enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a sexual motivation enhancement. If the offender committed the offense with sexual motivation and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:(i) Two years for any felony defined under the law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least ((twenty))20 years, or both;(ii) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ((ten))10 years, or both;(iii) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both;(iv) If the offender is being sentenced for any sexual motivation enhancements under (a)(i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced for any sexual motivation enhancements on or after July 1, 2006, under (a)(i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection, all sexual motivation enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all sexual motivation enhancements under this subsection are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other sexual motivation enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c); or(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;(c) The sexual motivation enhancements in this subsection apply to all felony crimes;(d) If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a sexual motivation enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced;(e) The portion of the total confinement sentence which the offender must serve under this subsection shall be calculated before any earned early release time is credited to the offender;(f) Nothing in this subsection prevents a sentencing court from imposing a sentence outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW 9.94A.535.(9) An additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the standard sentence range for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089 committed on or after July 22, 2007, if the offender engaged, agreed, or offered to engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the one-year enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to the enhancement. If the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089, and the offender attempted, solicited another, or conspired to engage, agree, or offer to engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee, an additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section. For purposes of this subsection, "sexual conduct" means sexual intercourse or sexual contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.(10)(a) For a person age ((eighteen))18 or older convicted of any criminal street gang-related felony offense for which the person compensated, threatened, or solicited a minor in order to involve the minor in the commission of the felony offense, the standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by ((one hundred twenty-five))125 percent. If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence is the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender.(b) This subsection does not apply to any criminal street gang-related felony offense for which involving a minor in the commission of the felony offense is an element of the offense.(c) The increased penalty specified in (a) of this subsection is unavailable in the event that the prosecution gives notice that it will seek an exceptional sentence based on an aggravating factor under RCW 9.94A.535.(11) An additional ((twelve))12 months and one day shall be added to the standard sentence range for a conviction of attempting to elude a police vehicle as defined by RCW 46.61.024, if the conviction included a finding by special allegation of endangering one or more persons under RCW 9.94A.834.(12) An additional ((twelve))12 months shall be added to the standard sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW 9.94A.831.(13) An additional ((twelve))12 months shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.520 or for vehicular assault committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.522, or for any felony driving under the influence (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or felony physical control under the influence (RCW 46.61.504(6)) for each child passenger under the age of ((sixteen))16 who is an occupant in the defendant's vehicle. These enhancements shall be mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other minor child enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. If the addition of a minor child enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement shall be mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions.(14) An additional ((twelve))12 months shall be added to the standard sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW 9.94A.832.(15) An additional 12 months may, at the discretion of the court, be added to the standard sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW 9.94A.828.(16)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, an additional 12 months shall be added to the standard sentence range for an offense if the conviction included a finding by special allegation of attempting to conceal identity under section 1 of this act.(b) The court may impose an additional fine not to exceed $5,000 in addition to, or in lieu of, the 12-month enhancement described in (a) of this subsection.(17) Regardless of any provisions in this section, if a person is being sentenced in adult court for a crime committed under age ((eighteen))18, the court has full discretion to depart from mandatory sentencing enhancements and to take the particular circumstances surrounding the defendant's youth into account.--- END ---